District of Columbia statutes.
42-3114

Availability of other remedies.

The provisions of this chapter shall not limit the availability of other remedies under the law or other equitable relief whether or not an adequate remedy exists at law.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-194, § 15, 45 DCR 7982

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-3314.

Temporary Addition of Section

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3101.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of chapter, see notes to § 42-3101.